Utah statutes.
78B-5-703.   Taking of affidavits in foreign country.

An affidavit taken in a foreign country, to be used in this state, may be taken before an ambassador, minister, consul, vice consul or consular agent of the United States, or before any judge of a court of record having a seal, in the foreign country.

